Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 4. Dental Hygienists

§ 621.
License by examination.

To be eligible for licensure as a dental hygienist, an applicant shall:

have attained the age of majority;

be a graduate of a program of dental hygiene accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation of the American Dental Association;

present to the Board a certificate of the National Board of Dental Examiners;

have completed an approved emergency office procedure course;

have passed the American Board of Dental Examiners (ADEX) examination or other examination approved by the Board; and

have passed the dental hygienist jurisprudence examination.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 13.

§ 622.
Licensure by endorsement.

The Board may grant a license to practice dental hygiene to an applicant who is a graduate of a program of dental hygiene accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation of the American Dental Association and who:

is currently licensed in good standing to practice dental hygiene in any jurisdiction of the United States or Canada that has licensing requirements deemed by the board to be substantially equivalent to those of this State;

has successfully completed an approved emergency office procedures course;

has successfully completed the dental hygienist jurisprudence examination; and

has met active practice and any other requirements established by the Board by rule.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 13.

§ 623.
Licensure by endorsement based on training and experience.

The Board may grant a license to an applicant who has met the training and experience requirements established by the Board by rule under its authority provided in this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 13.

§ 624.
Practice.

A dental hygienist may perform duties for which the dental hygienist has been qualified by successful completion of the normal curriculum offered by programs of dental hygiene accredited by the American Dental Association or in continuing education courses approved by the Board. A dental hygienist may perform tasks in the office of any licensed dentist consistent with rules adopted by the Board.

A public-health hygienist, who shall be a dental hygienist with no fewer than three years of experience, may perform tasks in out-of-office settings, including residences, schools, nursing home and long-term care facilities, clinics, hospitals, medical facilities, community health centers licensed or approved by the Department of Health, Head Start programs, and any other facilities or programs deemed appropriate by the Department of Health in a manner consistent with guidelines adopted by the Board by rule.

A dental hygienist, when authorized by the Board by rule, may administer local anesthetics under the direct supervision and by the prescription of a licensed dentist.
(c) (1) A dental hygienist, when authorized by the Board by rule, may administer local anesthetics under the direct supervision and by the prescription of a licensed dentist.

The license of a dental hygienist authorized by Board rule to administer local anesthetics shall have a special endorsement to that effect.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 13; amended

2013, No. 27

, § 3;

2019, No. 30

, § 10.